Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB554.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "foreign source" means:
(a) A foreign government, including an agency of a foreign government;
(b) A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created solely under the laws of
one (1) or more foreign states;
(c) An individual who is not a citizen or a national of the United States or a
trust territory or protectorate thereof; or
(d) An agent, including a subsidiary or affiliate of a foreign legal entity, acting
on behalf of an individual or entity described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this
subsection.
(2) (a) A school district, local board of education, superintendent, or any other
agent acting on behalf of a public school shall not accept or receive funds
from, or enter into a contract with:
1. The government of the People's Republic of China;
2. The Chinese Communist Party; or
3. Any individual or entity acting directly or indirectly on behalf of a
government or party listed in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph.
(b) A school district, local board of education, superintendent, or any other
agent acting on behalf of a public school shall, as a term of a contract
entered into by or on behalf of a public school, require the parties to the
contract to state that they have no association with the parties listed in
paragraph (a)1. to 3. of this subsection.
(3) No later than thirty (30) days after receiving funds or entering into a contract
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1576
with a foreign source, a school district shall submit to the commissioner of
education a written report that identifies:
(a) The name and country of origin of the foreign source;
(b) In a case in which a school receives funds from a foreign source:
1. The amount of funds received from that source; and
2. Any terms or conditions applicable to the receipt of the funds; and
(c) In a case in which a school enters into a contract with a foreign source, the
terms and conditions of the contract.
(4) By November 1 of each year, the commissioner of education shall file a report
with the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim
Joint Committee on Education detailing the reports received by the commissioner
of education pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "foreign source" means:
(a) A foreign government, including an agency of a foreign government;
(b) A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created solely under the laws of
one (1) or more foreign states;
(c) An individual who is not a citizen or a national of the United States or a
trust territory or protectorate thereof; or
(d) An agent, including a subsidiary or affiliate of a foreign legal entity, acting
on behalf of an individual or entity described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this
subsection.
(2) (a) A public postsecondary education institution or any agent acting on behalf
thereof shall not accept or receive funds from, or enter into a contract with:
1. The government of the People's Republic of China;
2. The Chinese Communist Party; or
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1576
3. Any individual or entity acting directly or indirectly on behalf of a
government or party listed in subparagraph 1. and 2. of this
paragraph.
(b) A public postsecondary education institution or any agent acting on behalf
thereof shall, as a term of a contract entered into by or on behalf of a public
institution of postsecondary education, require the parties to the contract to
state that they have no association with the parties listed in paragraph (a)1.
to 3. of this subsection.
(3) No later than thirty (30) days after receiving funds or entering into a contract
with a foreign source, a public postsecondary education institution shall submit
to the Council on Postsecondary Education a written report that identifies:
(a) The name and country of origin of the foreign source;
(b) In a case in which an institution receives funds from a foreign source:
1. The amount of funds received from that source; and
2. Any terms or conditions applicable to the receipt of the funds; and
(c) In a case in which an institution enters into a contract with a foreign
source, the terms and conditions of the contract.
(4) By November 1 of each year, the Council on Postsecondary Education shall file a
report with the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate
Interim Joint Committee on Education detailing the reports received by the
council pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:38 PM Jacketed